Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 5, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 20E), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 20E. A. Upon the effective date of this act, Class A3
shall include the following criminal offenses:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. Domestic assault and battery with a deadly weapon, as
provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection D of Section 644 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Second or subsequent conviction of domestic abuse against a
pregnant woman with knowledge of the pregnancy, as provided for in
subsection E of Section 644 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. Aggravated assault and battery upon a police officer,
sheriff, deputy sheriff or highway patrolman, corrections personnel,
or any state peace officer, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 650 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. Shooting with the intent to kill, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 652 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. Using a vehicle to facilitate the intentional discharge of a
firearm, crossbow, or other weapon, as provided for in subsection B
of Section 652 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
6. Assault and battery with a deadly weapon, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 652 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
7. Maiming, as provided for in Section 752 751 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
8. Sexual abuse by a caretaker, as provided for in paragraph 2
of subsection B of Section 843.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
9. Child abuse, as provided for in subsection A of Section
843.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

10. Enabling child abuse, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 843.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. Child sexual abuse, as provided for in subsection E of
Section 843.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
12. Enabling child sexual abuse, as provided for in subsection
G of Section 843.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
13. Child sexual exploitation, as provided for in subsection H
of Section 843.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
14. Enabling child sexual exploitation, as provided for in
subsection J of Section 843.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
15. Lewd or indecent proposals or acts to a child, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
16. Terrorism, as provided for in subsection B of Section
1268.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
17. Conspiracy to commit terrorism, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 1268.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
18. Any person above the age of eighteen (18) who, on campuses
or public school grounds, advocates revolution, sabotage, force and
violation, sedition, treason, or the overthrow of the United States
government, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1327 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
19. Arson in the first degree, as provided for in subsection A
of Section 1401 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

20. Arson while manufacturing, attempting to manufacture, or
endeavoring to manufacture a controlled dangerous substance, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 1401 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes; and
21. Causing personal injury while committing an act of arson,
as provided for in Section 1405 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of a Class A3 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished in accordance with the
corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 6, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 20F), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 20F. A. Upon the effective date of this act, Class B1
shall include the following criminal offenses:
1. Accessory to murder in the second degree, as provided for in
paragraph 5 of Section 175 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Rescuing or attempting to rescue a prisoner charged or
convicted of a felony, as provided for in paragraph 1 of Section 521
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. Aiding suicide, as provided for in Section 813 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

4. Aiding suicide by furnishing the person with deadly weapons
or poisonous drugs, as provided for in Section 814 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. Mingling poison, controlled dangerous substances, or sharp
objects harmful to human life with any food, drink, medicine, or
water, as provided for in Section 832 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
6. Abuse, financial neglect, neglect, or exploitation by a
caretaker, as provided for in paragraph 1 of subsection B of Section
843.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
7. Exploitation of an elderly person or disabled adult, as
provided for in Section 843.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
8. Engaging in child neglect, as provided for in subsection C
of Section 843.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
9. 8. Enabling child neglect, as provided for in subsection D
of Section 843.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
10. 9. Forcible sodomy, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 888 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. 10. Sodomy by a person over eighteen (18) years of age upon
a person under sixteen (16) years of age, as provided for in
paragraph 1 of subsection B of Section 888 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
12. 11. Sodomy upon a person incapable through mental illness
or unsoundness of mind to give legal consent, as provided for in
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

para graph 2 of subsection B of Section 888 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
13. 12. Sodomy with any person by means of force, violence, or
threats of force or violence, as provided for in paragraph 3 of
subsection B of Section 888 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
14. 13. Sodomy upon a person under the legal custody,
supervision, or authority of a state agency, county, municipality,
or political subdivision of the state, as provided for in paragraph
4 of subsection B of Section 888 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
15. 14. Sodomy upon a person at least sixteen (16) years of age
but less than twenty (20) years of age and who is a student of any
public or private secondary school, junior high, high school, or
public vocational school with a person eighteen (18) years of age or
older and who is employed by the same school system, as provided for
in paragraph 5 of subsection B of Section 888 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
16. 15. Sodomy upon a person who is unconscious, as provided
for in paragraph 7 of subsection B of Section 888 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
17. 16. Sodomy upon a person who is intoxicated by a narcotic
or anesthetic agent administered by or with the privity of the
accused, as provided for in paragraph 8 of subsection B of Section
888 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

18. 17. Procuring or causing the participation of a minor in
child pornography or possessing, procuring, manufacturing, selling,
or distributing child pornography, as provided for in Section 1021.2
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
19. 18. Permitting or consenting to the participation of a
minor in child pornography by a parent, guardian, or individual
having custody, as provided for in Section 1021.3 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
20. 19. Buying, procuring, or possessing child pornography, as
provided for in Section 1024.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
21. 20. Child prostitution sex trafficking, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 1029 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
22. 21. Receiving or offering to agree to receive a child for
purposes of prostitution, as provided for in paragraph 2 of
subsection A of Section 1087 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
23. 22. Transporting or aiding in the transport of a child for
prostitution, as provided for in paragraph 3 of subsection A of
Section 1087 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
24. 23. Permitting the prostitution of a child in any house,
building, room, other premises, or any conveyances under the control
of a person, as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection B of
Section 1087 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
25. 24. Causing, inducing, persuading, or encouraging a child
by promise, threats, violence, or any device or scheme to engage in
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

pros titution, as provided for in paragraph 1 of subsection A of
Section 1088 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
26. 25. Keeping, holding, detaining, restraining, or compelling
a child to engage in prostitution, as provided for in paragraph 2 of
subsection A of Section 1088 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
27. 26. Keeping, holding, detaining, restraining, or compelling
a child to engage in prostitution for purposes of compelling the
child to pay, liquidate, or cancel any debts, dues, or obligations
incurred by the child, as provided for in paragraph 3 of subsection
A of Section 1088 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
28. 27. Permitting the keeping, holding, detaining, or
restraining of a child for prostitution in any house, building,
room, other premises, or any conveyances under the control of a
person, as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection B of Section
1088 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
29. 28. Advocating the revolution, sabotage, force and
violation, sedition, treason, or overthrow of the government of the
United States, as provided for in Section 1266 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
30. 29. Commit, attempt to commit, or aid in the commission of
any act intended to overthrow, destroy, or alter the government of
the United States, as provided for in Section 1266.4 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

31. 30. Biochemical terrorism, as provided for in subsection D
of Section 1268.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
32. 31. Biochemical assault when the person knows the substance
is toxic, noxious, or lethal to humans, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1268.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
33. 32. Second or subsequent conviction of using a firearm
while committing a felony, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1287 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
34. 33. Discharging a firearm or other deadly weapon at or into
a dwelling or building used for public or business purposes, as
provided for in Section 1289.17A of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
35. 34. Directing, advising, encouraging, or soliciting other
persons to commit acts of force or violence while participating in a
riot, as provided for in paragraph 4 of Section 1312 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
36. 35. Burglary in the first degree, as provided for in
Section 1431 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
37. 36. Seizing or exercising control of any bus by force or
violence or by threats of force or violence, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 1903 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
38. 37. Using a dangerous or deadly weapon while seizing or
exercising control of a bus or when intimidating, threatening,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

assa ulting, or battering a bus driver, as provided for in subsection
C of Section 1903 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
39. 38. Receiving, acquiring, and concealing proceeds derived
from unlawful activities in an amount of more than Fifty Thousand
Dollars ($50,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection G
of Section 2001 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
40. 39. Participating in racketeering activities, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 1403 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
41. 40. Acquiring or maintaining any interest in or control of
any enterprise or real property through racketeering activities, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 1403 of Title 22 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
42. 41. Using or investing any part of proceeds derived from
racketeering activities, as provided for in subsection C of Section
1403 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
43. 42. Conspiring with others to commit unlawful racketeering
activities, as provided for in subsection D of Section 1403 of Title
22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
44. 43. Causing an accident resulting in great bodily injury
while driving under the influence of alcohol or other intoxicating
substance, as provided for in paragraph 1 of subsection B of Section
11-904 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

45. 44. Trafficking in fentanyl or carfentanyl, or any fentanyl
analogs or derivatives, as provided for in subparagraph a of
paragraph 12 of subsection C of Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of a Class B1 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished in accordance with the
corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY Section 9, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 20I), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 20I. A. Upon the effective date of this act, Class B4
shall include the following criminal offenses:
1. Concealing the birth or death of a child, as provided for in
Section 53 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Assault, battery, or assault and battery with a sharp or
dangerous weapon, as provided for in Section 645 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
3. Robbery in the second degree, as provided for in Section 799
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. Neglecting a vulnerable adult, as provided for in subsection
B A of Section 843.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. Malicious harassment of another person based on that
person's race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, or

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

disa bility, as provided for in Section 850 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
6. Abandonment of a child under ten (10) years of age, as
provided for in Section 851 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
7. Abandonment of a wife or child under fifteen (15) years of
age, as provided for in Section 853 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
8. Second or subsequent conviction for causing, aiding,
abetting, encouraging, soliciting, or recruiting a minor to
participate, join, or associate with a criminal street gang, as
provided for in subsection E of Section 856 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
9. Incest, as provided for in Section 885 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
10. Crime against nature, as provided for in Section 886 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. Taking or enticing away any child under sixteen (16) years
of age with the intent to detain or conceal such child, as provided
for in Section 891 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
12. Indecent exposure, as provided for in paragraph 1 of
subsection A of Section 1021 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
13. Procuring, counseling, or assisting another to commit an
act of indecent exposure, as provided for in paragraph 2 of
subsection A of Section 1021 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

14. Preparing, publishing, selling, distributing, downloading
on a computer, or exhibiting obscene material or child pornography,
as provided for in paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section 1021 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
15. Preparing, selling, giving, loaning, distributing, or
exhibiting any type of obscene material or child pornography, as
provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 1021 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
16. Operating, owning, or maintaining a house of prostitution,
soliciting, enticing, or procuring another for prostitution, or
transporting or assisting in the transport of another for
prostitution purposes, as provided for in Section 1028 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
17. Engaging in prostitution or soliciting, inducing, enticing,
or procuring another to commit an act of prostitution, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 1029 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
18. Purchasing, selling, or distributing obscene material or
child pornography, as provided for in Section 1040.13 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
19. Encouraging, offering, or soliciting sexual conduct with a
minor by use of technology, as provided for in Section 1040.13a of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

20. Promoting a pyramid promotional scheme, as provided for in
Section 1073 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
21. Second or subsequent offense of permitting prostitution in
any house, building, room, or premises under the control of such
person, as provided for in Section 1086 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
22. Offering or offering to secure a child under eighteen (18)
years of age for the purpose of prostitution or transporting or
assisting in the transport of a child under eighteen (18) years of
age to a house, place, building, vehicle, or other conveyance for
the purpose of prostitution, as provided for in paragraph 1 of
subsection A of Section 1087 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
23. Knowingly permitting the prostitution of a child under
eighteen (18) years of age by an owner, proprietor, manager,
conductor, or other person in any house, place, building, room, or
other premises under the control of such person, as provided for in
paragraph 2 of subsection B of Section 1087 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
24. Taking a woman against her will to compel her by force or
duress to marry another, as provided for in Section 1118 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
25. Abduction of a child under fifteen (15) years of age for
the purpose of marriage, concubinage, or any crime involving moral

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

turp itude, as provided for in Section 1119 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
26. Sexual battery, as provided for in subsection B of Section
1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
27. Indecent acts with a human corpse, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
28. Desecration of a human corpse, as provided for in Section
1161.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
29. Stalking within ten (10) years of a prior conviction for
stalking, as provided for in subsection D of Section 1173 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
30. Interfering with, molesting, or assaulting firefighters in
the performance of their duties, as provided for in Section 1217 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
31. Concealment of hazardous waste, as provided for in Section
1230.7 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
32. Criminal syndicalism, as provided for in Section 1261 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
33. Sabotage, as provided for in Section 1262 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
34. Advocating or teaching criminal syndicalism or sabotage, as
provided for in Section 1263 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
35. Destroying, interfering, hindering, or tampering with real
or personal property with intent to hinder, delay, or interfere with
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prep arations for defense or for war, as provided for in Section
1265.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
36. Make or cause defects with any article or thing with
reasonable grounds to believe such article or thing will be used for
defense or for war, as provided for in Section 1265.3 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
37. Conspiracy to commit crimes provided in the Sabotage
Prevention Act, as provided for in Section 1265.5 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
38. Terrorism hoax, as provided for in Section 1268.4 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
39. Engaging in terrorist activity by manufacturing, sending,
delivering, or possessing any toxic, noxious, or lethal substances,
chemical, biological, or nuclear materials, as provided for in
Section 1268.6 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
40. Conducting or attempting to conduct financial transactions
involving property related to terrorism, as provided for in Section
1268.7 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
41. Using a money services business or an electronic funds
transfer in violation of the Oklahoma Antiterrorism Act, as provided
for in Section 1268.8 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
42. Possession of a firearm by a convicted felon, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 1283 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 16
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

43. Possession of a firearm by a person serving a term of
probation for a felony or who is subject to supervision, probation,
parole, or inmate status, as provided for in subsection C of Section
1283 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
44. Possession of a firearm by a person previously adjudicated
as a delinquent child or youthful offender, as provided for in
subsection D of Section 1283 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
45. Possession of a firearm by a person who is an alien
illegally or unlawfully in the United States, as provided for in
subsection E of Section 1283 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
46. Allowing a convicted felon, adjudicated delinquent, or
youthful offender to possess a pistol authorized for use under the
Oklahoma Self-Defense Act by a person who has a handgun license, as
provided for in subsection F of Section 1283 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
47. Use of a firearm or other offensive weapon while committing
a felony, as provided for in Section 1287 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
48. Pointing a firearm, as provided for in Section 1289.16 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
49. Manufacturing, importing, or selling restricted bullets, as
provided for in Section 1289.20 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 17
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

50. Possessing, carrying, or using or attempting to use against
another person any restricted bullets, as provided for in Section
1289.21 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
51. Committing a felony while wearing body armor, as provided
for in Section 1289.26 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
52. Carrying a stolen handgun, as provided for in subsection B
of Section 1290.21 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
53. Incitement to riot, as provided for in Section 1320.2 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
54. Malicious destruction or damage to real or personal
property or malicious injury to another during a state of emergency,
as provided for in Section 1321.7 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
55. Participating in a riot during a state of emergency, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 1321.8 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
56. Causing an innocent or irresponsible person to engage in a
riot, as provided for in subsection E of Section 1321.8 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
57. Possession of explosives by a convicted felon, as provided
for in Section 1368 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
58. Attempting, conspiring, or endeavoring to perform an act of
violence, as provided for in subsection A of Section 1378 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 18
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

59. Devising a plan, scheme, or program of action to cause
serious bodily harm or death of another person, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1378 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
60. Endangering any human life including emergency service
personnel while committing an act of arson, as provided for in
Section 1405 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
61. Intimidating, threatening, assaulting, or battering any
driver, attendant, guard, or passenger of a bus with intent to seize
the bus, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1903 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
62. Discharging any firearm into or within any bus, terminal,
or other transportation facility, as provided for in subsection D of
Section 1903 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
63. Leaving the scene of a vehicle accident that resulted in
the death of a person, as provided for in Section 10-102.1 of Title
47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
64. Second felony conviction of driving under the influence of
alcohol or other intoxicating substance, as provided for in
paragraph 3 of subsection C of Section 11-902 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
65. Causing an accident resulting in the death of another
person while operating a vehicle without a valid driver license, as
provided for in subsection C of Section 11-905 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 19
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

66. Throwing or dropping any substance at a moving vehicle, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 11-1111 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
67. Throwing or dropping any object from a bridge or overpass
with intent to damage property or injure a person, as provided for
in subsection B of Section 11-1111 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
68. Manufacturing, selling, transferring, or furnishing a
precursor substance to another with knowledge the recipient will use
such substance to unlawfully manufacture a controlled substance, as
provided for in subsection C of Section 2-328 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
69. Second or subsequent conviction for manufacturing, selling,
transferring, furnishing, or receiving a precursor substance, as
provided for in subsection D of Section 2-328 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
70. Purchasing, obtaining, possessing, manufacturing, selling,
or transferring a precursor substance without a permit or making a
false statement in an application or report, as provided for in
subsection E of Section 2-328 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
71. Selling, transferring, distributing, or dispensing any
product containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or
phenylpropanolamine to another with knowledge the purchaser will use
such product as a precursor to manufacture methamphetamine or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 20
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

anot her controlled illegal substance, as provided for in Section 2-
333 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
72. Cultivating, producing, or knowingly permitting the
cultivation or production of any species of plants from which
controlled dangerous substances may be derived, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 2-509 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
73. Manufacturing or attempting to manufacture any controlled
dangerous substance by cooking, burning, or extracting and
converting marijuana marihuana or marijuana marihuana oil into
hashish, hashish oil, or hashish powder, as provided for in
subsection H of Section 2-509 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
74. Purchasing or possessing any quantity of pseudoephedrine by
a person who is subject to the Oklahoma Methamphetamine Offender
Registry Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section 2-701 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
75. Using an explosive or blasting agent with the intent to
kill, injure, or intimidate a person or unlawfully damage real or
personal property, as provided for in subsection B of Section 124.8
of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of a Class B4 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished in accordance with the
corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 21
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 4. AMENDATORY Section 10, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 20J), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 20J. A. Upon the effective date of this act, Class B5
shall include the following criminal offenses:
1. Second or subsequent conviction for assault and battery
against a current or former intimate partner or a family or
household member, as provided for in subsection C of Section 644 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Second or subsequent conviction for domestic abuse committed
in the presence of a child, as provided for in subsection G of
Section 644 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. Assault and battery by strangulation or attempted
strangulation against an intimate partner or a family or household
member, as provided for in subsection J of Section 644 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. Aggravated assault and battery, as provided for in Section
646 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. Battery or assault and battery upon a police officer,
sheriff, deputy sheriff, highway patrolman, corrections personnel,
or other state peace officer, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 649 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 22
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

6. Striking or mistreating a police dog or police horse during
the commission of a misdemeanor or felony, as provided for in
subsection D of Section 649.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
7. Disfiguring, disabling, or killing a police dog or police
horse during the commission of a misdemeanor or felony, as provided
for in subsection C of Section 649.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
8. Battery or assault and battery resulting in bodily injury to
any employee of the Office of Juvenile Affairs or residential
facility, as provided for in subsection E of Section 650.2 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
9. Assault with intent to kill, as provided for in Section 653
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
10. Assault with intent to commit any felony, as provided for
in Section 681 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. Manslaughter in the second degree, as provided for in
Section 716 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
12. Owning a mischievous animal that kills a human being, as
provided for in Section 717 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
13. Causing, aiding, abetting, or encouraging a minor to commit
or participate in committing a felony offense, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 856 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
14. Causing, aiding, abetting, encouraging, soliciting, or
recruiting a minor to participate, join, or associate with any
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 23
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

crim inal street gang, as provided for in subsection D of Section 856
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
15. Committing a gang-related offense as a condition of
membership in a criminal street gang, as provided for in Section
856.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
16. Stalking, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1173
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
17. Second or subsequent conviction of stalking or committing
the act of stalking within ten (10) years of the completion of
sentence for a prior conviction of stalking, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1173 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
18. Intentionally or recklessly spreading an infectious
disease, as provided for in Section 1192.1 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
19. Entering the premises of another while masked or disguised
with the intent to inflict bodily injury or injury to property, as
provided for in Section 1302 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
20. Assault with a dangerous weapon while masked or in
disguise, as provided for in Section 1303 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
21. Unlawful assembly for the purpose of engaging in a riot, as
provided for in Section 1320.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
22. Acts of cruelty to animals, as provided for in Section 1685
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 24
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

23. Instigating or encouraging any cockfight, as provided for
in Section 1692.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
24. Keeping a pit or other place or knowingly providing
equipment or facilities for cockfighting, as provided for in Section
1692.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
25. Servicing or facilitating a cockfight, as provided for in
Section 1692.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
26. Owning, possessing, keeping, or training any bird for
cockfighting, as provided for in Section 1692.5 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
27. Instigating or encouraging any fight between dogs, as
provided for in Section 1694 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
28. Keeping a house, pit, or other place, or providing any
equipment or facilities to be used for any fight between dogs, as
provided for in Section 1695 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
29. Acting or performing any service in the furtherance of or
facilitating any dogfight, as provided for in Section 1696 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
30. Owning, possessing, keeping, or training any dog with
intent to have such dog fight another dog, as provided for in
Section 1697 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
31. Failing to stop for an accident resulting in a nonfatal
injury to another person, as provided for in Section 10-102 of Title
47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 25
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

28. 32. Personal injury accident while driving or operating a
motor vehicle under the influence of alcohol or other intoxicating
substance while having a previous conviction for driving or
operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or
other intoxicating substance, as provided for in paragraph 2 of
subsection A of Section 11-904 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
29. 33. Failure to register as a sex offender, as provided for
in Section 583 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
30. 34. Furnishing false or misleading information in the
registration required by the Sex Offenders Registration Act, as
provided for in Section 586 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
31. 35. Failure to comply with the Sex Offenders Registration
Act, as provided for in subsection A of Section 587 of Title 57 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
32. 36. Failure to comply with established guidelines of
global-positioning-system (GPS) monitoring pursuant to the
provisions of the Sex Offenders Registration Act, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 587 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
33. 37. Temporarily or permanently residing within a two-
thousand-foot radius of a public or private school site or other
listed places by a person required to register pursuant to the Sex
Offenders Registration Act, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 590 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 26
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

34. 38. Residing with a minor child after being convicted of an
offense that involved a minor child by a person required to register
pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 590 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
35. 39. Two or more sex offenders residing together in a
dwelling during the term of registration as a sex offender, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 590.1 of Title 57 of the
Oklahoma Statutes; and
36. 40. Establishing, leasing, operating, or owning any
structure where persons required to register pursuant to the Sex
Offenders Registration Act are allowed to reside, as provided for in
subsection E of Section 590.1 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of a Class B5 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished in accordance with the
corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY Section 12, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 20L), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 20L. A. Upon the effective date of this act, Class C1
shall include the following criminal offenses:
1. Assisting a prisoner, who is confined in prison for a
felony, to escape from prison, as provided for in paragraph 1 of
Section 437 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 27
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Carrying in or sending into a prison anything useful to aid
a prisoner, who is confined in prison for a felony, in escaping from
prison, as provided for in paragraph 1 of Section 438 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. Harboring, assisting, or concealing any person guilty of a
felony, outlaw, or fugitive from justice, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 440 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. Preventing or attempting to prevent any person from giving
testimony or producing records or documents, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 455 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. Threatening physical harm through force or fear or causing
physical harm to any person who provided testimony in any civil or
criminal trial or proceeding, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 455 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
6. Causing Endangering any other person while attempting to
elude a peace officer or causing an accident resulting in great
bodily injury while eluding or attempting to elude an a peace
officer, as provided for in subsection B or C of Section 540A of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
7. Fighting any duel, as provided for in Section 662 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
8. Financial exploitation of an elderly or disabled adult with
funds, assets, or property valued at One Hundred Thousand Dollars

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 28
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

($10 0,000.00) or more, as provided for in paragraph 1 of subsection
B of Section 843.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
9. Arson in the third degree by setting fire, burning, or using
explosive devices to burn any property, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 1403 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
10. Arson in the fourth degree by placing or distributing any
flammable, explosive, or combustible material or substance in any
building or property with the intent to set fire to or burn the
same, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1404 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. Burglary in the second degree by breaking and entering into
the dwelling house of another in which no human is present, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 1435 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
12. Stealing in the night time from the person of another, as
provided for in Section 1708 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
12. Soliciting another to commit certain computer crimes, as
provided for in paragraph 10 of subsection A of Section 1953 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
13. Receiving, acquiring, or concealing proceeds or engaging in
transactions involving proceeds of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00)
or more that were derived from unlawful activities, as provided for
in paragraph 3 of subsection G of Section 2001 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 29
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

14. Making a false affidavit, as provided for in Section 6-302
of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
15. Using or soliciting the use of services of a minor to
distribute, dispense, transport, or cultivate a controlled dangerous
substance, as provided for in subsection E of Section 2-401 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
16. Transporting with intent to distribute or dispense,
distributing, or possessing with intent to distribute a controlled
dangerous substance within two thousand (2,000) feet of a public or
private school, college or university, park, or child care facility,
as provided for in subsection F of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
17. Acquiring or obtaining possession of a controlled dangerous
substance by a registrant through misrepresentation, fraud, forgery,
deception, or subterfuge, as provided for in paragraph 3 of
subsection A of Section 2-406 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
18. Employing, hiring, or using a minor to transport, carry,
sell, give away, prepare for sale, or peddle any controlled
dangerous substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-
419.1 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
19. Employing, hiring, or using a minor to transport, carry,
sell, give away, prepare for sale, or peddle any controlled
dangerous substance subsequent to a previous conviction of the same,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 30
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

as p rovided for in subsection C of Section 2-419.1 of Title 63 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
20. Evading federal reporting requirements or other federal
money laundering laws, as provided for in Section 2-503.1f of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
21. Owning, operating, or conducting a chop shop, as provided
for in paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 4253 of Title 63 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
22. Transporting any vessel, motor, or vessel or motor parts to
or from a chop shop, as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection A
of Section 4253 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
23. Selling, transferring, purchasing, or receiving any vessel,
motor, or vessel or motor parts to or from a chop shop, as provided
for in paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section 4253 of Title 63 of
the Oklahoma Statutes; and
24. Burglary in the second degree by breaking and entering into
the dwelling house of another in which no human is present, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 1435 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of a Class C1 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished by imprisonment in the
custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not more than
eight (8) years and shall serve at least twenty-five percent (25%)
of the sentence imposed before release from custody including
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 31
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

rele ase to electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9 of Title
57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
C. 1. Every person who, having been previously convicted of
one or two Class C or Class D criminal offenses, commits a Class C1
criminal offense shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment
in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not
less than two (2) years nor more than twelve (12) years and shall
serve at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the sentence imposed
before release from custody including release to electronic
monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
2. Every person who, having been previously convicted of three
Class C or Class D criminal offenses, or one or more Class Y, Class
A, or Class B criminal offenses, commits a Class C1 criminal offense
shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment in the custody
of the Department of Corrections for a term of not less than two (2)
years nor more than thirty (30) years and shall serve at least fifty
percent (50%) of the sentence imposed before release from custody
including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9
of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
D. 1. Unless specifically exempted pursuant to subsection E of
this section, Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
shall not apply to Class C1 criminal offenses.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 32
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. The criminal offenses listed in paragraphs 15 and 18 of
subsection A of this section shall be exempt from the penalty
provisions provided for in subsections B and C of this section.
Persons convicted of the criminal offenses provided for in
paragraphs 15 and 18 of subsection A of this section shall be
punished in accordance with the corresponding penalties provided for
in the Oklahoma Statutes including Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
3. The criminal offense listed in paragraph 19 of subsection A
of this section shall be exempt from the penalty provision provided
for in subsection B of this section. Persons convicted of the
criminal offense provided for in paragraph 19 of subsection A of
this section shall be punished in accordance with the corresponding
penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes including Section
51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The provisions of
subsection C of this section still applies apply to the criminal
offense listed in paragraph 19 of subsection A of this section.
E. All Class C1 criminal offenses shall be punishable by the
corresponding fines as provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY Section 13, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 20M), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 20M. A. Upon the effective date of this act, Class C2
shall include the following criminal offenses:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 33
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. Theft of anhydrous equipment, as provided for in subsection
B of Section 11-10 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Branding, misbranding, marking, or mismarking any domestic
animal with intent to defraud, as provided for in Section 268 of
Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. 3. Injuring, destroying, or attempting to injure or destroy
any pipeline transportation system, as provided for in subsection C
of Section 6.1 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. 4. Embezzlement by a county treasurer or other officer, as
provided for in Section 641 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. 5. Giving or offering any bribe to an executive officer, as
provided for in Section 265 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. 6. Receiving or agreeing to receive a bribe by an executive
officer or person elected or appointed to an executive office, as
provided for in Section 266 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
6. 7. Entry into a restricted area of a building or grounds
using or carrying a deadly or dangerous weapon or firearm or
engaging in acts of violence that result in great bodily injury, as
provided for in paragraph 1 of subsection B of Section 282 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
7. 8. Forcefully or fraudulently preventing the Legislature
from meeting or organizing, as provided for in Section 301 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 34
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

8. 9. Forcefully or fraudulently compelling or attempting to
compel the Legislature to adjourn or disperse, as provided for in
Section 303 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
9. 10. Compelling or attempting to compel either house of the
Legislature to pass, amend, or reject any bill or resolution, grant
or refuse any petition, or to perform or omit to perform any other
official act, as provided for in Section 305 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
10. 11. Offering to give a bribe to any member of the
Legislature in order to influence the member in giving or
withholding a vote, as provided for in Section 308 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. 12. Asking, receiving, or agreeing to receive any bribe by
a member of the Legislature, as provided for in Section 309 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
12. 13. Entering a fort, magazine, arsenal, armory, arsenal
yard, or encampment and seizing or taking away arms, ammunition,
military stores, or supplies belonging to the state, as provided for
in Section 350 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
13. 14. Carrying, causing to be carried, or publicly displaying
any red flag or other emblem or banner indicating disloyalty to the
Government of the United States, as provided for in Section 374 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 35
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

14. 15. Bribery by a fiduciary, as provided for in subsection A
of Section 380 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
15. 16. Bribery of a fiduciary, as provided for in subsection B
of Section 380 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
16. 17. Commercial bribery of an insured depository institution
or credit union, as provided in Section 380.1 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
17. 18. Accepting or requesting a bribe by public officers or
employees of this state, as provided for in Section 382 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
18. 19. Offering or giving a bribe to any judicial officer, as
provided for in Section 383 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
19. 20. Attempting to influence a juror, as provided for in
Section 388 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
20. 21. Conspiracy to commit a felony, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 421 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
21. 22. Conspiring to commit any act against the peace of the
state by two or more persons outside of the state, as provided for
in Section 422 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
22. 23. Conspiring to commit any act against the state by two
or more persons, as provided for in Section 424 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 36
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

23. Endangering any other person while attempting to elude a
peace officer, as provided for in subsection B of Section 540A of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
24. Attempting to avoid a roadblock by failing to stop, passing
by or through such roadblock without permission, as provided for in
Section 540B of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
25. Fraudulently producing an infant in order to intercept the
inheritance or distribution of any personal estate or real estate,
as provided for in Section 578 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
26. Maiming by inflicting upon one's self any disabling injury,
as provided for in Section 752 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
27. Financial exploitation of an elderly or disabled adult with
funds, assets, or property valued at One Hundred Thousand Dollars
($100,000.00) or less, as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection
B of Section 843.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
28. Conducting gambling games, as provided for in Section 941
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
29. Using a house, room, or place to conduct gambling games, as
provided for in Section 946 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
30. Engaging or participating in gambling games by a public
officer, as provided for in Section 948 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
31. Commercial gambling, as provided for in Section 982 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 37
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

32. Letting premises for the purpose of betting on races or
receiving, registering, recording, or forwarding any money or thing
of value to a racetrack for betting purposes, as provided for in
paragraphs 2 through 6 of subsection A of Section 991 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
33. Using the terms "prize" or "gift" in a manner that is
untrue or misleading, as provided for in Section 996.3 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
34. Advocating criminal syndicalism, sabotage, or the
necessity, propriety, or expediency of doing any act of physical
violence or unlawful act as a means of accomplishing any industrial
or political ends, change, or revolution, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 1327 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
35. Arson in the fourth degree by attempting to set fire to or
burn any building or property, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1404 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
36. Delivering to another any merchandise for which any bill of
lading, receipt, or voucher has been issued and the value of the
property is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as
provided for in paragraph 4 of Section 1416 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
37. Burglary in the second degree by breaking and entering into
any commercial building or by breaking and entering into a coin-

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 38
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

oper ated or vending machine, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1435 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
38. Embezzlement of property valued at Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection B
of Section 1451 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
39. Embezzlement by a county or state officer, as provided for
in subsection C of Section 1451 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
40. False personation of another, as provided for in Section
1531 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
41. Receiving money or property intended for another with a
value of Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided
for in paragraph 4 of Section 1532 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
42. Use of a motor vehicle or motor-driven cycle for the
purpose of falsely impersonating a law enforcement officer which
causes another person to be injured, defrauded, harassed, vexed, or
annoyed, as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection F of Section
1533 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
43. Obtaining, attempting to obtain, or presenting to a
financial institution personal, financial, or other information of
another person, as provided for in Section 1533.2 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 39
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

44. Obtaining property by trick, deception, or by means of a
false or bogus check and the property value is Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in paragraph 3 of
subsection A of Section 1541.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
45. Making, drawing, uttering, or delivering two or more false
or bogus checks and the value is Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in paragraph 3 of subsection A
of Section 1541.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
46. Selling, exchanging, or delivering any forged or
counterfeited promissory note, check, bill, draft, or other evidence
of debt knowing the same is forged or counterfeited and the value of
the instrument is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as
provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 1577 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
47. Possession of any forged, altered, or counterfeited
negotiable note, bill, draft, or other evidence of debt and the
value of the instrument is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or
more, as provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 1578
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
48. Possession of any forged or counterfeited instrument with
intent to injure or defraud and the value of the instrument is
Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in
paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 1579 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 40
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

49. Uttering or publishing as true any forged, altered, or
counterfeited instrument or counterfeit coins and the value of the
instrument is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as
provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 1592 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
50. Exhibiting false, forged, or altered books, papers,
vouchers, security, or other instruments of evidence to any public
officer or board with intent to deceive, as provided for in Section
1632 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
51. Destroying, altering, mutilating, or falsifying any books,
papers, writing, or securities belonging to a corporation or
association with intent to defraud, as provided for in Section 1635
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
52. Instigating or encouraging any fight between dogs, as
provided for in Section 1694 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
53. Keeping a house, pit, or other place, or providing any
equipment or facilities to be used for any fight between dogs, as
provided for in Section 1695 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
54. Acting or performing any service in the furtherance of or
facilitating any dogfight, as provided for in Section 1696 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
55. Owning, possessing, keeping, or training any dog with
intent to have such dog fight another dog, as provided for in
Section 1697 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 41
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

56. Larceny of lost property and the value of the property is
Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in
paragraph 4 of Section 1702 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
57. 53. Grand larceny and the value of the property is Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in paragraph
4 of subsection A of Section 1705 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
58. 54. Grand larceny in any dwelling house or vessel, as
provided for in Section 1707 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
59. 55. Larceny of any evidence of debt or other written
instrument, as provided for in Section 1709 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
60. 56. Buying or receiving any property that has been stolen,
embezzled, or obtained by false pretense or robbery and has a value
of Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in
paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section 1713 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
61. 57. Buying or receiving any construction equipment or farm
equipment that has been stolen, embezzled, or obtained by false
pretense or robbery, as provided for in Section 1713.1 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
62. 58. Bringing into this state the stolen property of another
obtained from another state or country, as provided for in Section
1715 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 42
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

63. 59. Larceny of livestock or implement of husbandry, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 1716 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
64. 60. Larceny of a dog, as provided for in Section 1718 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
65. 61. Grand larceny of exotic livestock, as provided for in
Section 1719.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
66. 62. Larceny of an aircraft, automobile, construction
equipment, or farm equipment, valued at Fifty Thousand Dollars
($50,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section 1720 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
67. 63. Tapping or drilling into a pipeline, as provided for in
Section 1721 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
68. 64. Taking any crude oil or gasoline from any pipe,
pipeline, tank, tank car, or other receptacle or container and the
value of such product is One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more,
as provided for in paragraph 2 of Section 1722 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
69. 65. Larceny of merchandise from a retailer or wholesaler
and the value of the goods is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00)
or more, as provided for in paragraph 5 of subsection A of Section
1731 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 43
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

70. 66. Larceny of trade secrets that is valued at Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section
1732 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
71. 67. Procuring, soliciting, selling, or receiving by
fraudulent, deceptive, or false means two to ten telephone records
without authorization, as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection
B of Section 1742.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
72. 68. Masking, altering, or removing any locomotive or
railway car lights or signals, as provided for in Section 1778 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
73. 69. Mutilating, tearing, defacing, obliterating, or
destroying any written instrument, value of Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section 1779 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
74. 70. Violations of the Oklahoma Computer Crimes Act, as
provided for in paragraphs 1, 2, 3, 6, 7, 9, or 10 of subsection A
of Section 1953 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
75. 71. Contracting the sale of rights arising from a criminal
act without providing for the forfeiture of the proceeds, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 17 of Title 22 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
76. 72. Violating any of the provisions of the Oklahoma Clean
Air Act knowing that the violation places others in danger of death

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 44
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

or s erious bodily injury, as provided for in subsection B of Section
2-5-116 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
77. 73. Violating any of the provisions of the Oklahoma
Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Act knowing that the
violation places others in imminent danger of death or serious
bodily injury, as provided for in subparagraph a of paragraph 3 of
subsection G of Section 2-6-206 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
78. 74. Soliciting or accepting any bribe or money by a game
warden in connection with the performance of his or her duties as a
game warden, as provided for in subsection E of Section 3-201 of
Title 29 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
79. 75. Taking or enticing away an incapacitated or partially
incapacitated person or person for whom a guardian has been
appointed without consent of the guardian, as provided for in
Section 4-904 of Title 30 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
80. 76. Violating any of the provisions of the Viatical
Settlements Act of 2008 if the value of the viatical settlement
contract is more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00)
but not more than Thirty-five Thousand Dollars ($35,000.00), as
provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection F of Section 4055.14 of
Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 45
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

81. 77. Embezzlement of certain funds held in trust, value of
Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in
paragraph (2) of Section 153 of Title 42 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
82. 78. Providing any false statement of a material fact in an
application for a certificate of title, as provided for in Section
4-108 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
83. 79. Altering or forging any certificate of title issued by
the Oklahoma Tax Commission, as provided for in Section 4-109 of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
84. 80. Perjury by making any false affidavit, as provided for
in Section 6-302 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
85. 81. Creating, manufacturing, issuing, or selling security
verification forms, as provided for in subsection B of Section 7-612
of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
86. 82. Committing a subsequent violation of driving under the
influence of alcohol or other intoxicating substance within ten (10)
years of being convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol
or other intoxicating substance, causing a personal injury accident
while driving under the influence of alcohol or other intoxicating
substance, or driving under the influence of alcohol or other
intoxicating substance while transporting a child, as provided for
in paragraph 2 of subsection C of Section 11-902 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 46
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

87. 83. Operating a vehicle without a valid driver license for
the class of vehicle being operated and causing an accident
resulting in great bodily injury to another person, as provided for
in subsection B of Section 11-905 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
88. 84. Operating a crusher without a proper license and
receiving, obtaining, or possessing any vehicle or property known to
be stolen, as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection B of Section
592.9 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
89. 85. Selling a vehicle or other property to a crusher using
false or altered identification or making a false declaration of
ownership or lien status, as provided for in paragraph 3 of
subsection B of Section 592.9 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
90. 86. Owning, operating, or conducting a chop shop,
transporting any motor vehicle or parts to or from a chop shop, or
selling, transferring, purchasing, or receiving any motor vehicle or
parts to or from a chop shop, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1503 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
91. 87. Altering, counterfeiting, defacing, destroying,
disguising, falsifying, forging, obliterating, or knowingly removing
a vehicle identification number, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 1503 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 47
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

92. 88. Perjury by a public officer or employee who states as
true any material matter knowing it to be false, as provided for in
Section 36.5 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
93. 89. Advocating by teaching, justifying, or becoming a
member of or affiliated with the Communist Party or with any other
party or organization that advocates for the revolution, sedition,
treason, or overthrow of the government of the United States or the
State of Oklahoma by a public officer or employee, as provided for
in Section 36.6 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
94. 90. Perjury by verifying under oath any report, map, or
drawing required to be filed with the Corporation Commission knowing
that such material is false, as provided for in Section 109 of Title
52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
95. 91. Asking, receiving, or agreeing to receive any gift or
gratuity by any member of the Corporation Commission, as provided
for in Section 118 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
96. 92. Burglary in the first degree by a bail enforcer by
breaking into and entering the dwelling house of any defendant or
third party for purposes of recovery or attempted recovery of a
defendant, as provided for in subsection A of Section 1350.6 of
Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
97. 93. Distributing, dispensing, transporting, or possessing a
controlled dangerous substance or soliciting a person less than
eighteen (18) years of age to cultivate, distribute, or dispense a
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 48
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

cont rolled dangerous substance, as provided for in paragraph 1 of
subsection A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
98. 94. Creating, distributing, transporting, or possessing a
counterfeit controlled dangerous substance, as provided for in
paragraph 2 of subsection A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
99. 95. Manufacturing or distributing a controlled substance or
synthetic controlled substance, as provided for in paragraph 1 of
subsection C of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
100. 96. Larceny, burglary, or theft of a controlled dangerous
substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-403 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
101. 97. Obtaining or attempting to obtain any controlled
dangerous substance by fraud, deceit, misrepresentation, or
subterfuge, as provided for in paragraph 1 of subsection A of
Section 2-407 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
102. 98. Obtaining or attempting to obtain any controlled
dangerous substance by forgery of, alteration of, or changing any
information on a prescription or any written order, as provided for
in paragraph 2 of subsection A of Section 2-407 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
103. 99. Obtaining or attempting to obtain any controlled
dangerous substance by the concealment of a material fact, as

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 49
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prov ided for in paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section 2-407 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
104. 100. Obtaining or attempting to obtain any controlled
dangerous substance by the use of a false name or false address, as
provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 2-407 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
105. 101. Obtaining or attempting to obtain any controlled
dangerous substance by failing to disclose the receipt or
prescription of a controlled dangerous substance of the same or
similar therapeutic use from another practitioner, as provided for
in paragraph 5 of subsection A of Section 2-407 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
106. 102. Manufacturing, creating, delivering, or possessing an
original prescription form or counterfeit prescription form, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 2-407 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
107. 103. Receiving or acquiring proceeds known to be derived
from any violation of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances
Act, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-503.1 of Title 63
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
108. 104. Knowingly or intentionally giving, selling,
transferring, trading, investing, concealing, transporting, or
maintaining an interest in anything of value which is intended to be
used for committing a violation of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 50
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Subs tances Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section 2-503.1
of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
109. 105. Directing, planning, organizing, initiating,
financing, managing, supervising, or facilitating the transportation
or transfer of proceeds known to be derived from a violation of the
Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 2-503.1 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
110. 106. Conducting a financial transaction involving proceeds
derived from a violation of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous
Substances Act for the purpose of concealing or disguising the
nature, location, source, ownership, or control of the proceeds
known to be derived from a violation of the Uniform Controlled
Dangerous Substances Act, as provided for in subsection D of Section
2-503.1 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
111. 107. Encouraging, facilitating, or allowing access to any
money transmitter equipment for unlawful purposes, as provided for
in subsection B of Section 2-503.1d of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
112. 108. Using a money services business or electronic funds
transfer network to facilitate any violation of the Uniform
Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, as provided for in Section 2-
503.1e of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 51
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

113. 109. Structuring, assisting, or attempting to structure
any unlawful transaction with one or more financial or nonfinancial
trades or businesses, as provided for in Section 2-503.1g of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
114. 110. Altering, counterfeiting, defacing, destroying,
disguising, falsifying, forging, obliterating, or removing a hull
identification number of a vessel or motor, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 4253 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
115. 111. Commit or attempt to commit certain violations of the
Vessel and Motor Chop Shop, Stolen and Altered Property Act, as
provided for in subsection D of Section 4253 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
116. 112. Giving a false or bogus check in payment or
remittance of taxes, fees, penalties, or interest levied pursuant to
any state tax laws and the value of the false or bogus check is Five
Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or more, as provided for in Section 218.1
of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
117. 113. Perjury by providing false answers to any questions
from the Oklahoma Tax Commission or making or presenting any false
affidavit to be filed with the Oklahoma Tax Commission, as provided
for in Section 244 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
118. 114. Perjury by verifying by oath, affirmation, or
declaration, any false report or false return that is to be filed

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 52
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

with the Oklahoma Tax Commission, as provided for in Section 246 of
Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
119. 115. Making or manufacturing any tax stamp or falsely or
fraudulently forging, counterfeiting, reproducing, or possessing any
tax stamp, as provided for in subsection (a) of Section 317 of Title
68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
120. 116. Offering or selling unregistered securities, as
provided for in Section 1-301 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
121. 117. Issuing investment certificates when insolvent by an
investment certificate issuer, as provided for in paragraph 1 of
subsection K of Section 1-308 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
122. 118. Transacting business as a broker-dealer without being
registered as a broker-dealer, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1-401 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
123. 119. Employing or associating with an individual for
security transaction purposes when the registration of the
individual is suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from
employment or association with a broker-dealer, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1-401 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
124. 120. Transacting business as an agent without being
registered as an agent, as provided for in subsection A of Section
1-402 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
125. 121. Employing or associating with an agent who transacts
business on behalf of broker-dealers when the agent is not
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 53
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

regi stered, as provided for in subsection D of Section 1-402 of
Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
126. 122. Conducting business on behalf of a broker-dealer when
the registration of the agent is suspended or revoked or the
individual is barred from employment or association with a broker-
dealer, as provided for in subsection F of Section 1-402 of Title 71
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
127. 123. Transacting business as an investment adviser without
being registered as an investment adviser, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 1-403 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
128. 124. Employing or associating with an individual to engage
in providing investment advice when the registration of the
individual is suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from
employment or association with an investment adviser, as provided
for in subsection C of Section 1-403 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
129. 125. Employing or associating with an individual required
to be registered as an investment adviser representative who is not
registered as an investment adviser representative, as provided for
in subsection D of Section 1-403 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
130. 126. Transacting business as an investment adviser
representative without being registered as an investment adviser

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 54
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

repr esentative, as provided for in subsection A of Section 1-404 of
Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
131. 127. Conducting business on behalf of an investment
adviser or federal-covered investment adviser when the registration
of the investment adviser representative is suspended or revoked or
the individual is barred from employment or association with an
investment adviser or federal-covered investment adviser, as
provided for in subsection E of Section 1-404 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
132. 128. Employing a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud
another when offering, selling, or purchasing a security, as
provided for in paragraph 1 of Section 1-501 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
133. 129. Making an untrue statement of a material fact or
omitting a material fact when offering, selling, or purchasing a
security, as provided for in paragraph 2 of Section 1-501 of Title
71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
134. 130. Engaging in an act, practice, or course of business
that operates as a fraud or deceit upon another person when
offering, selling, or purchasing a security, as provided for in
paragraph 3 of Section 1-501 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
135. 131. Employing a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud
another when advising others for compensation as to the value of

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 55
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

secu rities, as provided for in paragraph 1 of subsection A of
Section 1-502 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
136. 132. Making an untrue statement of a material fact or
omitting a material fact when advising others for compensation as to
the value of securities, as provided for in paragraph 2 of
subsection A of Section 1-502 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
137. 133. Engaging in an act, practice, or course of business
that operates as a fraud or deceit upon another person when advising
others for compensation as to the value of securities, as provided
for in paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section 1-502 of Title 71 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
138. 134. Making false or misleading statements in a record, as
provided for in Section 1-505 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
139. 135. Making or causing to be made to a purchaser,
customer, client, or prospective customer or client, an inconsistent
representation, as provided for in Section 1-506 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
140. 136. Willfully violating certain provisions of the
Oklahoma Uniform Securities Act of 2004, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 1-508 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
141. 137. Offering or selling any business opportunity without
being registered under the Oklahoma Business Opportunity Sales Act,
as provided for in Section 806 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 56
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

142. 138. Offering or selling any business opportunity without
a written disclosure being filed, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 808 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
143. 139. Offering or selling any business opportunity without
a business opportunity contract or agreement, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 809 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
144. 140. Making or using any specific representations from the
Oklahoma Business Opportunity Sales Act without having a minimum net
worth of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), as provided for in
Section 811 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
145. 141. Using information filed with or obtained by the
Administrator that is not public for the personal benefit of the
Administrator or any officers or employees of the Administrator, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 812 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
146. 142. Employing any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud
in connection with offering or selling any business opportunity, as
provided for in paragraph 1 of Section 819 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
147. 143. Making any untrue statement of a material fact or
omitting a material fact in connection with offering or selling any
business opportunity, as provided for in paragraph 2 of Section 819
of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 57
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

148. 144. Engaging in any act, practice, or course of business
which operates as a fraud or deceit in connection with offering or
selling any business opportunity, as provided for in paragraph 3 of
Section 819 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
149. 145. Making or causing to be made any false or misleading
statements or omitting to state a material fact necessary in any
document filed with the Administrator or in any proceeding pursuant
to the Oklahoma Business Opportunity Sales Act, as provided for in
Section 820 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
150. 146. Filing any application for registration that is
false, incomplete, or misleading, as provided for in Section 821 of
Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
151. 147. Publishing, circulating, or using any advertising
that contains untrue statements of material facts or omits to state
material facts necessary, as provided for in Section 822 of Title 71
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
152. 148. Taking or receiving any rebate, percentage of
contract, money, or any other thing of value by an officer of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services from any person, firm,
or corporation, as provided for in Section 71 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
153. 149. Monopolizing, attempting to monopolize, or conspiring
to monopolize any part of trade or commerce, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 203 of Title 79 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 58
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

154. 150. Discrimination in price between different purchasers
of commodities by any person engaged in commerce, as provided for in
Section 204 of Title 79 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
155. 151. Violation of the Oklahoma Antitrust Reform Act, as
provided for in Section 206 of Title 79 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
156. 152. Having any interest, directly or indirectly, in any
contract for the purchase of property or construction of work by or
for the Grand River Dam Authority by a director, officer, agent, or
employee, as provided for in Section 867 of Title 82 of the Oklahoma
Statutes; and
157. 153. Using explosive agent to kill, injure, or intimidate
or to damage property, as provided for in subsection B of Section
124.8 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
158. Theft of anhydrous equipment, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 11-10 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of a Class C2 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished by imprisonment in the
custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not more than
seven (7) years and shall serve at least twenty percent (20%) of the
sentence imposed before release from custody including release to
electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
C. 1. Every person who, having been previously convicted of
one or two Class C or Class D criminal offenses, commits a Class C2
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 59
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

crim inal offense shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment
in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not
less than two (2) years nor more than ten (10) years and shall serve
at least twenty percent (20%) of the sentence imposed before release
from custody including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to
Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
2. Every person who, having been previously convicted of three
Class C or Class D criminal offenses, or one or more Class Y, Class
A, or Class B criminal offenses, commits a Class C2 criminal offense
shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment in the custody
of the Department of Corrections for a term of not less than two (2)
years nor more than twelve (12) years and shall serve at least forty
percent (40%) of the sentence imposed before release from custody
including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9
of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
D. Unless specifically exempted pursuant to subsection E of
this section, Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
shall not apply to Class C2 criminal offenses.
E. 1. The criminal offenses listed in paragraphs 1, 2, 52, 53,
54, 55, 63, 65, 67, 68, 76, and 77 of subsection A of this section
shall be exempt from the penalty provisions provided for in
subsections B and C of this section. Persons convicted of the
criminal offenses provided for in paragraphs 1, 2, 52, 53, 54, 55,
63, 65, 67, 68, 76, and 77 of subsection A of this section shall be
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 60
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

puni shed in accordance with the corresponding penalties provided for
in the Oklahoma Statutes including Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
2. The criminal offense listed in paragraph 64 of subsection A
of this section shall be exempt from the penalty provision provided
for in subsection B of this section. Persons convicted of the
criminal offense provided for in paragraph 64 of subsection A of
this section shall be punished in accordance with the corresponding
penalties as provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes including Section
51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The provisions of
subsection C of this section still applies to the criminal offense
listed in paragraph 64 of subsection A of this section.
F. All Class C2 criminal offenses shall be punishable by the
corresponding fines as provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 7. AMENDATORY Section 17, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 20Q), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 20Q. Upon the effective date of this act, the minimum
time-served requirements on sentences mandated by the provisions of
this act, may shall be included in the instructions to the jury
during a criminal trial. If the minimum time-served requirements on
sentences are included in the instructions to the jury in a criminal
trial, the minimum time-served requirements shall be in the form of
a percentage.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 61
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 977, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 977. A. When judgment upon a conviction is rendered,
the clerk must enter the same upon the minutes, stating briefly the
offense for which the conviction has been had, and must immediately
annex together and file the following papers, which constitute a
record of the action:
1. The indictment and a copy of the minutes of the plea or
demurrer;
2. A copy of the minutes of the trial;
3. The charges given or refused, and the endorsements, if any,
thereon; and
4. A copy of the judgment, which shall include a notation of
the month and year of birth date of the defendant and the last four
digits of the Social Security number of the defendant. The judgment
shall also contain the statutory reference, including any relevant
subsections, to the felony crime the defendant was convicted of, the
classification level of the felony crime the defendant was convicted
of, the required amount of the minimum time to be served according
to the sentencing court, and the date of the offense.
B. The court shall obtain the month and year of birth date of
the defendant and the last four digits of the Social Security number
of the defendant.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 62
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 37, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 37. A. If all correctional facilities reach maximum
capacity and the Department of Corrections is required to contract
for bed space to house state inmates:
1. The Pardon and Parole Board shall consider all nonviolent
offenders for parole who are within six (6) months of their
scheduled release from a penal facility; and
2. Prior to contracting with a private prison operator to
provide housing for state inmates, the Department shall send
notification to all county jails in this state that bed space is
required to house the overflow population of state inmates. Upon
receiving notification, the sheriff or jail trust administrator of a
county jail is authorized to enter into agreements with the
Department to provide housing for the inmates. Reimbursement for
the cost of housing the inmates shall be a negotiated per diem rate
for each inmate as contracted but shall in no event be less than the
per diem rate provided for in Section 38 of this title.
B. No inmate may be received by a penal facility from a county
jail without first scheduling a transfer with the Department.
Within five (5) business days after the court orders the judgment
and sentence, the court clerk shall transmit to the Department by
facsimile, electronic mail, or actual delivery a certified copy of
the judgment and sentence.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 63
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. The receipt of the certified copy of the judgment and
sentence shall be certification that the sentencing court has
entered a judgment and sentence and all other necessary commitment
documents. The Department of Corrections is authorized to determine
the appropriate method of delivery from each county based on
electronic or other capabilities, and establish a method for issuing
receipts certifying that the Department has received the judgment
and sentence document. The Department shall establish a dedicated
electronic address location for receipt of all electronically
submitted judgment and sentence documents. The electronic address
location shall provide written receipt verification of each received
judgment and sentence document. Once an appropriate judgment and
sentence document is received by the Department of Corrections, the
Department shall contact the sheriff or jail trust administrator
when bed space is available to schedule the transfer and reception
of the inmate into the Department.
D. If the Department receives a judgment and sentence document
from a county that includes inaccurate information from the
sentencing court the Department shall notify the county within a
timely manner. If the Department receives a judgment and sentence
document from a county that is missing the classification level of
the felony crime, the Department shall default to the lowest
possible classification level for that offense. If the Department
receives a judgment and sentence document from a county that is
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 64
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

miss ing the required amount of the minimum time to be served, the
Department shall default to the lowest possible amount of the
minimum time to be served for that offense.
E. When a county jail has reached its capacity of inmates as
provided in the standards set forth in Section 192 of Title 74 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, then the county sheriff or jail trust
administrator shall notify the Director of the Oklahoma Department
of Corrections, or the Director's designated representative, by
facsimile, electronic mail, or actual delivery, that the county jail
has reached or exceeded its capacity to hold inmates. The
notification shall include copies of any judgment and sentences not
previously delivered as required by subsection B of this section.
Then within seventy-two (72) hours following such notification, the
county sheriff or jail trust administrator shall transport the
designated excess inmate or inmates to a penal facility designated
by the Department. The sheriff or jail trust administrator shall
notify the Department of the transport of the inmate prior to the
reception of the inmate. The Department shall schedule the
reception date and receive the inmate within seventy-two (72) hours
of notification that the county jail is at capacity, unless other
arrangements can be made with the sheriff or jail trust
administrator.
F. The Department will be responsible for the cost of housing
the inmate in the county jail including costs of medical care
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 65
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prov ided from the date the judgment and sentence was ordered by the
court until the date of transfer of the inmate from the county jail.
The Department shall implement a policy for determination of
scheduled dates on which an inmate or multiple inmates are to be
transferred from county jails. The policy shall allow for no less
than three alternative dates from which the sheriff or jail trust
administrator of a county jail may select and shall provide for
weather-related occurrences or other emergencies that may prevent or
delay transfers on the scheduled date. The policy shall be
available for review upon request by any sheriff or jail trust
administrator of a county jail. The cost of housing shall be the
per diem rate specified in Section 38 of this title. In the event
the inmate has one or more criminal charges pending in the same
Oklahoma jurisdiction and the county jail refuses to transfer the
inmate to the Department because of the pending charges, the
Department shall not be responsible for the housing costs of the
inmate while the inmate remains in the county jail with pending
charges. Once the inmate no longer has pending charges in the
jurisdiction, the Department shall be responsible for the housing
costs of the inmate for the period beginning on the date the
judgment and sentence or final order was ordered by the Court. In
the event the inmate has other criminal charges pending in another
Oklahoma jurisdiction, the Department shall be responsible for the
housing costs while the inmate remains in the county jail awaiting
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 66
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

tran sfer to another jurisdiction or until the date the inmate is
scheduled to be transferred to the Department, whichever is earlier.
Once the inmate is transferred to another jurisdiction, the
Department is not responsible for the housing cost of the inmate
until such time that another judgment and sentence is received by
the Department from another Oklahoma jurisdiction.
The sheriff or jail trust administrator may submit invoices for
the cost of housing the inmate on a monthly basis. Final payment
for housing an offender will be made only after the official
judgment and sentence is received by the Department of Corrections.
SECTION 10. This act shall become effective January 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
April 8, 2025 - DO PASS












SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2105 SFLR Page 67
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)